Florida, session 2026, HB853.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb853-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 853 2026
26
27 Section 1. Subsections (3) through (8) of section 162.21,
28 Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (4) through (9),
29 respectively, present subsection (8) is amended, and a new
30 subsection (3) is added to that section, to read:
31 162.21 Enforcement of county or municipal codes or
32 ordinances; penalties.—
33 (3) A county or municipality may adopt and enforce local
34 laws, codes, or ordinances to ensure compliance with chapter
35 723. A code enforcement officer may cite violations of local
36 laws, codes, or ordinances to a mobile home park owner or mobile
37 home owner, as applicable under s. 723.022 or s. 723.023, for
38 correction.
39 (9)(8) The provisions of This section is an are additional
40 and a supplemental means of enforcing county or municipal codes
41 or ordinances and may be used for the enforcement of any code or
42 ordinance, or for the enforcement of all codes and ordinances.
43 Except as provided in paragraph (4)(b) (3)(b), nothing contained
44 in this section does not shall prohibit a county or municipality
45 from enforcing its codes or ordinances by any other means.
46 Section 2. Section 723.022, Florida Statutes, is amended
47 to read:
48 723.022 Mobile home park owner's general obligations.—
49 (1) A mobile home park owner must shall at all times:
50 (a)(1) Comply with the requirements of applicable
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb853-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 853 2026
51 building, housing, fire, and health codes.
52 (b)(2) Maintain buildings and improvements in common areas
53 in a good state of repair and maintenance and maintain the
54 common areas in a good state of appearance, safety, and
55 cleanliness.
56 (c)(3) Provide access to the common areas, including
57 buildings and improvements thereto, at all reasonable times for
58 the benefit of the park residents and their guests.
59 (d)(4) Maintain utility connections and systems for which
60 the park owner is responsible in proper operating condition.
61 (e)(5) Comply with properly promulgated park rules and
62 regulations and require other persons on the premises with his
63 or her consent to comply therewith and conduct themselves in a
64 manner that does not unreasonably disturb the park residents or
65 constitute a breach of the peace.
66 (f) Require a mobile home owner to maintain a current
67 mobile home registration and have a validation sticker on the
68 mobile home at all times pursuant to chapter 320.
69 (g) Maintain up-to-date records regarding each mobile home
70 owner in the mobile home park and provide such records to the
71 unit of local government upon request for the purpose of
72 enforcing s. 723.023.
73 (h) Require the removal of any exterior modifications,
74 additions, or construction of any structure on a mobile home lot
75 which was built without the written approval of the mobile home
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb853-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 853 2026
76 park owner or the requisite building permits.
77 (i) Require a mobile home owner, or any person who has
78 consent from the mobile home owner to be on the mobile home lot,
79 to maintain his or her mobile home and mobile home lot in
80 accordance with all applicable building, housing, fire, and
81 health codes.
82 (2) A mobile home park owner is responsible for correcting
83 a violation of any local law, ordinance, or code cited by a unit
84 of local government under s. 723.024.
85 Section 3. Section 723.023, Florida Statutes, is amended
86 to read:
87 723.023 Mobile home owner's general obligations.—
88 (1) A mobile home owner must at all times shall:
89 (a)(1) At all times Comply with all obligations imposed on
90 mobile home owners by applicable provisions of building,
91 housing, fire, and health codes, including compliance with all
92 building permits and construction requirements for construction
93 on the mobile home and lot. The home owner is responsible for
94 all fines imposed by the local government for noncompliance with
95 any local codes.
96 (b)(2) At all times Keep the mobile home lot that he or
97 she occupies clean, neat, and sanitary, and maintained in
98 compliance with all local codes.
99 (c)(3) At all times Comply with properly promulgated park
100 rules and regulations and require other persons on the mobile
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb853-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 853 2026
101 home lot premises with the mobile home owner's his or her
102 consent to comply with such rules. The mobile home owner and to
103 conduct themselves, and other persons on the mobile home lot
104 premises with the mobile home owner's his or her consent must
105 conduct themselves, in a manner that does not unreasonably
106 disturb other residents of the park or constitute a breach of
107 the peace.
108 (d)(4) Receive written approval from the mobile home park
109 owner before making any exterior modification or addition to the
110 home.
111 (e)(5) When vacating the premises, remove any debris and
112 other property of any kind which is left on the mobile home lot.
113 (2) A unit of local government may adopt and enforce local
114 laws, ordinances, or codes to ensure compliance with this
115 section and s. 723.022. A mobile home owner is responsible for
116 correcting a violation of any local law, ordinance, or code
117 cited by a unit of local government under s. 723.024.
118 Section 4. Section 723.024, Florida Statutes, is amended
119 to read:
120 723.024 Compliance by mobile home park owners and mobile
121 home owners.—Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter
122 or of any local law, ordinance, or code:
123 (1) A unit of local government may adopt and enforce local
124 laws, ordinances, or codes to ensure compliance with ss. 723.022
125 and 723.023. If a unit of local government finds that a
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb853-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 853 2026
126 violation of a local law, code, or ordinance has occurred, the
127 unit of local government shall cite the responsible party for
128 the violation and enforce the citation under its local code and
129 ordinance enforcement authority.
130 (2) A lien, penalty, fine, or other administrative or
131 civil proceeding may not be brought against a mobile home owner
132 or mobile home for any duty or responsibility of the mobile home
133 park owner under s. 723.022 or against a mobile home park owner
134 or mobile home lot park property for any duty or responsibility
135 of the mobile home owner under s. 723.023.
136 (3) Notwithstanding subsection (2), a unit of local
137 government may bring a lien, penalty, fine, or other
138 administrative civil proceeding under chapter 162, or other
139 applicable law, against a mobile home park owner or a mobile
140 home lot when all of the following occur:
141 (a) The unit of local government has provided written
142 notice to a mobile home park owner of a code violation on a
143 mobile home lot on which a mobile home is placed.
144 (b) The time period in the written notice for correcting
145 such violation has expired.
146 (c) The mobile home park owner has failed to take
147 reasonable steps to comply with local laws, codes, or
148 ordinances.
149 Section 5. Paragraph (b) of subsection (6) of section
150 723.011, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb853-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 853 2026
151 723.011 Disclosure prior to rental of a mobile home lot;
152 prospectus, filing, approval.—
153 (6)
154 (b) If a park owner violates this section and a lessee
155 suffers a substantial loss or damage to the lessee's mobile home
156 or personal property as a result of flooding, the lessee may
157 terminate the rental agreement by giving a written notice of
158 termination to the park owner no later than 30 days after the
159 date of the damage or loss. Termination of a rental agreement
160 under this section is effective when the requirements of s.
161 723.023(1)(e) s. 723.023(5) are met. For the purpose of this
162 paragraph, the term "substantial loss or damage" means the total
163 cost of repairs to or replacement of the mobile home and
164 personal property is 50 percent or more of the mobile home and
165 personal property's market value on the date the flooding
166 occurred.
167 Section 6. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb853-00